Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Department of Public Information

153.005.
Definition. [Repealed.]

153.010.
Department of public information created — Commissioner to head — Purpose. [Repealed.]

153.020.
Duties of department — How performed — Donations — Allocation of costs. [Repealed.]

153.021.
Related services. [Repealed.]

153.030.
Property, records, personnel, appropriation balance, trust and agency funds of Division of Publicity; transfer to department. [Repealed.]